Maryland, session 2026, HB1431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–15.
(h) (4) The Sports Wagering Application Review Commission shall:
(i) to the extent permitted by federal and State law, actively seek to
achieve racial, ethnic, and gender diversity when awarding licenses; [and]
(ii) encourage applicants who qualify as a minority business
enterprise, as defined in § 14–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, or who
are small, minority, or women–owned business entities to apply for sports wagering
licenses under this subtitle; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1431*

HOUSE BILL 1431
(III) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS UNDER § 9–1E–06 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, ACCEPT AND CONSIDER AN APPLICATION FOR A SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSE THAT IS SUBMITTED BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.